Vermont, session 2025-2026, H569.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1851 is amended to read:
§ 1851. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Advanced practice registered nurse” or “APRN” means an
individual licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, subchapter 2.
(2) “Hospital” means a hospital required to be licensed under chapter 43
of this title.
VT LEG #385546 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.569
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2)(3) “Patient” means a person an individual admitted to a hospital on
an inpatient basis.
(4) “Physician” means an individual licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter
23 or 33.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 1852 is amended to read:
§ 1852. PATIENTS’ BILL OF RIGHTS; ADOPTION
(a) The General Assembly hereby adopts the “Bill of Rights for Hospital
Patients” as follows:
(1) The patient has the right to considerate and respectful care at all
times and under all circumstances with recognition of his or her the patient’s
personal dignity.
(2) The patient shall have an attending physician or APRN who is
responsible for coordinating a the patient’s care. Physician consultation and
support shall be available to an attending APRN at all times in accordance with
applicable standards of practice and regulatory requirements.
(3) The patient has the right to obtain, from the physician or APRN
coordinating his or her the patient’s care, complete and current information
concerning diagnosis, treatment, and any known prognosis in terms the patient
can reasonably be expected to understand. If the patient consents or if the
patient is incompetent or unable to understand, immediate family members or a
guardian may also obtain this information. The patient has the right to know
VT LEG #385546 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.569
2026 Page 3 of 6
by name the attending physician or APRN primarily responsible for
coordinating his or her the patient’s care.
(4) Except in emergencies, the patient has the right to receive from the
patient’s physician or APRN information necessary to give informed consent
prior to the start of any procedure or treatment, or both. Such information for
informed consent should include the specific procedure or treatment, or both;
the medically significant risks involved; and the probable duration of
incapacitation. Where medically significant alternatives for care or treatment
exist, or when the patient requests information concerning medical alternatives,
the patient has the right to such information. The patient also has the right to
know the name of the person responsible for the procedures or treatment, or
both.
* * *
(7) The patient has the right to expect that all communications and
records pertaining to his or her the patient’s care shall be treated as
confidential. Only medical personnel, or individuals under the supervision of
medical personnel, directly treating the patient, or those persons monitoring the
quality of that treatment, or researching the effectiveness of that treatment,
shall have access to the patient’s medical records. Others may have access to
those records only with the patient’s written authorization.
* * *
VT LEG #385546 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.569
2026 Page 4 of 6
(9) The patient has the right to know the identity and professional status
of individuals providing service to him or her the patient and to know which
physician, APRN, or other practitioner is primarily responsible for his or her
the patient’s care. This includes the patient’s right to know of the existence of
any professional relationship among individuals who are treating him or her
the patient, as well as the relationship to any other health care or educational
institutions involved in his or her the patient’s care.
* * *
(11) The patient has the right to expect reasonable continuity of care.
The patient has the right to be informed by the attending physician or APRN of
any continuing health care requirements following discharge.
* * *
(13) The patient has the right to know what hospital rules and
regulations apply to his or her the patient’s conduct as a patient.
* * *
(b) Failure to comply with any provision of this section may constitute a
basis for disciplinary action against a physician under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or
33 or against an APRN under 26 V.S.A. chapter 28. A complaint may be filed
with the Board of Medical Practice or the Office of Professional Regulation as
applicable based on the license held by the practitioner.
VT LEG #385546 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.569
2026 Page 5 of 6
(c) A summary of the hospital’s obligations under this section, written in
clear language and in easily readable print, shall be distributed to patients upon
admission and posted conspicuously at each nurse’s station. Such notice shall
also indicate that as an alternative or in addition to the hospital’s complaint
procedures, the patient may directly contact the licensing agency, the Office of
Professional Regulation, or the Board of Medical Practice, as applicable. The
address and telephone number of the licensing agency, the Office of
Professional Regulation, and the Board of Medical Practice shall be included
in the notice.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 1905 is amended to read:
§ 1905. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS
Upon receipt of an application for a license and the license fee, the licensing
agency shall issue a license when it determines that the applicant and hospital
facilities meet the following minimum standards:
* * *
(5) All patients admitted to the hospital shall be under the care of a State
registered and licensed practicing physician as defined by the laws of the State
of Vermont physician licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33 or an
advanced practice registered nurse licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28,
subchapter 2. All hospitals shall use the uniform credentialing application
form described in subsection 9408a(b) of this title.
VT LEG #385546 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.569
2026 Page 6 of 6
* * *
(8) Professional case records shall be compiled for all patients and
signed by the attending physician or advanced practice registered nurse. These
records shall be kept on file for a minimum of 10 years.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385546 v.1